Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1189
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Administrative Services may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the State Government Recycling Management Act.

Laws 1986, LB 380, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1140.06;

Laws 1990, LB 987, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 81-1648;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 100.